Colorado, session 2026A, SB040.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-32-103, amend
(1)(a) as follows:
29-32-103. Transfers of money - permitted uses of the fund -
continuous appropriation.
(1) (a) The affordable housing support fund is hereby created in the
state treasury. The support fund consists of money deposited into it under
subsections (1)(b)(II) and (3) of this section. The division of housing shall
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

administer the support fund and expend the money in the support fund only
for the purposes set forth in section 29-32-104 (3)(a) and (3)(b). The
division of local government in the department of local affairs created in
section 24-32-103 shall expend the money in the support fund only for the
purposes set forth in section 29-32-104 (3)(c). Except as otherwise provided
in subsection (1)(b) of this section, all money not expended or encumbered,
and all interest earned on the investment or deposit of money in the support
fund, remains in the support fund and does not revert to the general fund or
any other fund at the end of any fiscal year. Except as otherwise provided
in subsections (1)(b) and (1)(c) of this section and section 29-32-104
(3)(b)(II), all money transferred to the support fund pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section is continuously appropriated to the division of housing for
the purposes set forth in section 29-32-104 (3)(a) and (3)(b) and, to the
extent allocated by the division of housing, to the division of local
government for the purposes set forth in section 29-32-104 (3)(c).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-32-104, amend
(1)(a) and (3)(a) as follows:
29-32-104. Permissible expenditures - affordable housing
programs - report - definitions.
(1) The office shall contract with the administrator. The office may
select an administrator without a competitive procurement process but shall
announce the contract opening publicly and select the administrator in a
meeting that is open to the public, no less than seventy-two hours after
notice of such meeting is publicly available. No single contract may exceed
five years in duration. Upon the expiration of any contract term, the office
may renew the contract with the same administrator or may select another
administrator. The administrator selected by the office shall expend the
money transferred to the financing fund in section 29-32-103 (2) that the
administrator receives from the office to support the following programs
only:
(a) (I) A land banking program to be administered by the
administrator. The program shall provide grants to local governments and
tribal governments and loans to non-profit organizations with a
demonstrated history of providing affordable housing to acquire and
preserve land for the development of affordable housing. For purposes of
this subsection (1)(a), "affordable housing" means rental housing that has
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-040

a designated imputed income limit by household size not to exceed sixty
percent of the area median income as established by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development and published by the
department or a statewide political subdivision or authority on housing, and
regulated units in the project must have a gross rent limit that does not
exceed thirty percent of the imputed income limitation applicable to the
units and for-sale housing that could be purchased by a household with an
annual income of at or below one hundred TWENTY percent of the area
median income. Mixed use development is an allowable use of land
purchased under this program if the predominant use of the land is
affordable housing. Loans made by the program shall be forgiven if land
acquired with the assistance of the program is properly zoned with an active
plan for the development of affordable housing within 5 years of date the
loan is made and if the development is permitted and funded within 10
years. The lender and borrower may establish additional terms if needed. If
land acquired with the assistance of the program is not developed within the
timeline above, the loan must be repaid, with interest, as soon as practical,
but not more than six months after expiration of said timeline, unless the
office agrees to extend all or a portion of the timeline in its reasonable
discretion. Land acquired with the assistance of the program that is not
developed within the timeline above may be used by the owner for any
purpose upon payment of the loan with interest or, in exchange for a waiver
of interest, conveyed to a state agency or other entity for the development
of affordable housing with the approval of the administrator. All principal
and interest payments on loans made under this paragraph (a) SUBSECTION
(1)(a) shall be paid to the administrator and used by the administrator for
the purposes set forth in this subsection (1). As determined by the
administrator, a minimum of 15% and a maximum of 25% of monies
transferred to the financing fund annually may be used for the program. The
administrator may utilize the funds it receives from the office for the
program to pay for the costs of administering the program; except that the
total combined annual administrative expenditures of money from the
financing fund by the administrator and the office shall not exceed two
percent of the funds the administrator receives from the office for the
program for the state fiscal year.
(II) FOR LAND BANKING PROGRAM GRANTS TO SUPPORT TRIBAL
GOVERNMENT PROGRAMS, THE TRIBE SHALL ESTABLISH INCOME LIMITS BY
HOUSEHOLD SIZE AND GROSS RENT LIMITS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION
(1)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION. THE TRIBAL GOVERNMENT SHALL SUBMIT
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-040

EVIDENCE TO THE OFFICE OR ADMINISTRATOR THAT IT HAS SATISFIED THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION (1)(a)(II), INCLUDING BY PROVIDING
GENERAL INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROCESS IT USED TO ESTABLISH THESE
LIMITATIONS, BUT SHALL NOT BE REQUIRED TO DISCLOSE CONFIDENTIAL
TRIBAL DATA, INCLUDING THE SPECIFIC LIMITATIONS IT SETS PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (1)(a)(II).
(3) The division of housing and the division of local government
shall expend the money transferred to the support fund in section 29-32-103
(1) to support the following programs only:
(a) (I) An affordable home ownership program administered by the
division or one or more contractors of the division. The program shall offer
home ownership down-payment assistance to first-time homebuyers and
shall prioritize assistance, to the extent practicable, to first-generation
homebuyers. The assistance shall be provided to households with income
less than or equal to one hundred twenty percent of the area median income
of households of that size in the territory or jurisdiction of local government
or tribal government in which the housing is located, as calculated and
published for a given year by the United States department of housing and
urban development, and the cost of the monthly housing payment toward
mortgage principal, mortgage interest, property taxes, mortgage and
homeowner's insurance, homeowner association fees, land lease fees, and
metropolitan district fees shall MUST not cost more than thirty-five
THIRTY-EIGHT percent of monthly household income. INCOME; EXCEPT THAT
THE COST OF THE MONTHLY HOUSING PAYMENT MUST NOT BE CONSIDERED
WHEN PROVIDING HOMEOWNERS WITH ASSISTANCE FOR HOME
REHABILITATION. The program shall also make grants to nonprofit
organizations, local governments, tribal governments, community
development financial institutions, and community land trusts to support
affordable home ownership FOR HOUSEHOLDS WITH INCOME LESS THAN OR
EQUAL TO EITHER ONE HUNDRED TWENTY PERCENT OF THE AREA MEDIAN
INCOME OF HOUSEHOLDS OF THAT SIZE IN THE TERRITORY OR JURISDICTION
OF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT IN WHICH THE HOUSEHOLDS ARE LOCATED, OR
ONE HUNDRED TWENTY PERCENT OF THE STATEWIDE AREA MEDIAN INCOME
OF HOUSEHOLDS OF THAT SIZE, AS CALCULATED AND PUBLISHED FOR A GIVEN
YEAR BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN
DEVELOPMENT, AND THE COST OF THE MONTHLY HOUSING PAYMENT
TOWARD MORTGAGE PRINCIPAL, MORTGAGE INTEREST, PROPERTY TAXES,
MORTGAGE AND HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE, HOMEOWNERS' ASSOCIATION
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-040

FEES, LAND LEASE FEES, AND METROPOLITAN DISTRICT FEES MUST NOT COST
MORE THAN THIRTY-FIVE PERCENT OF MONTHLY HOUSEHOLD INCOME. THE
AREA MEDIAN INCOME ELECTION DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3)(a)(I)
MUST BE MADE AT THE BEGINNING OF THE ASSISTANCE AGREEMENT AND
MUST NOT BE REVOKED OR CHANGED UNTIL THE END OF THE ASSISTANCE
AGREEMENT. The program shall also make grants or loans to groups or
associations of mobile home owners and their assignees to assist them with
the purchase of a mobile home park pursuant to section 38-12-217. Said
grants and loans shall be used to support affordable home ownership for
households with income less than or equal to one hundred TWENTY percent
of the area median income of households of that size in the territory or
jurisdiction of local government or tribal government in which the
households are located, as calculated and published for a given year by the
United States department of housing and urban development, and the cost
of the monthly housing payment toward mortgage principal, mortgage
interest, property taxes, mortgage and homeowner's insurance, homeowner
association fees, land lease fees, and metropolitan district fees shall MUST
not cost more than thirty-five percent of monthly household income. All
principal and interest payments on loans made under this subsection (3)(a)
shall be paid to the division and used by the division for the purposes set
forth in this subsection (3). Up to fifty percent of money transferred to the
support fund annually may be used for the program. The division shall
determine how much of the available funding shall be allocated to each
aspect of the program. The division may utilize up to five percent of the
funds it receives from the fund for the program to pay for the direct and
indirect costs of administering the program.
(II) FOR PROJECTS UNDERTAKEN BY AN ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATION, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 29-32-105.7 (2)(a), THE DIVISION MAY INCREASE OR
WAIVE THE MAXIMUM PERCENTAGE OF INCOME THAT A HOUSEHOLD MAY
ALLOCATE FOR MONTHLY HOUSING COSTS OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (3)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION PURSUANT TO THE PROCESS SET
FORTH IN SECTION 29-32-105.7. IF A WAIVER IS GRANTED, THE DIVISION IS
AUTHORIZED TO AMEND EXISTING CONTRACTS ENTERED INTO AFTER JULY 1,
2026, EVEN IF THE PROJECT WAS ORIGINALLY AWARDED UNDER A
SOLICITATION ISSUED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026.
(III) FOR GRANTS TO SUPPORT TRIBAL GOVERNMENT PROGRAMS,
THE TRIBE SHALL ESTABLISH LIMITATIONS ON HOUSEHOLD INCOME AND
MAXIMUM PERCENTAGE OF INCOME THAT A HOUSEHOLD MAY ALLOCATE FOR
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-040

MONTHLY HOUSING COSTS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (3)(a)(I) OF THIS
SECTION AND SHALL ESTABLISH A TRIBAL AFFORDABILITY MECHANISM IN
LIEU OF ANY STATE-PRESCRIBED USE COVENANT. THE TRIBAL GOVERNMENT
SHALL SUBMIT EVIDENCE TO THE DIVISION THAT IT HAS SATISFIED THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION (3)(a)(III), INCLUDING BY PROVIDING
GENERAL INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROCESS IT USED TO ESTABLISH THESE
LIMITATIONS AND MECHANISMS BUT IS NOT REQUIRED TO DISCLOSE
CONFIDENTIAL TRIBAL DATA, INCLUDING THE SPECIFIC LIMITATIONS OR
MECHANISMS IT SETS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION. UNLESS OTHERWISE
AUTHORIZED BY LAW, THE DIVISION OF HOUSING AND THE DIVISION OF LOCAL
GOVERNMENT SHALL ADMINISTER AND EXPEND FUNDING TO TRIBAL
GOVERNMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION ONLY FOR THE PURPOSES SET FORTH IN
SECTIONS 29-32-104 (3)(a), (3)(b), OR (3)(c).
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 29-32-105.7 as
follows:
29-32-105.7. Home ownership program flexibility - waiver -
affordability mechanisms - legislative declaration - definitions.
(1) (a) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(I) PROPOSITION 123, APPROVED BY A MAJORITY OF ELIGIBLE
ELECTORS DURING THE NOVEMBER 2022 GENERAL ELECTION, WAS INTENDED
TO REACH ALL COMMUNITIES IN THE STATE;
(II) AFFORDABLE HOME OWNERSHIP OPPORTUNITIES ARE LIMITED BY
CHANGING ECONOMIC CONDITIONS THROUGHOUT THE STATE;
(III) THE FUNDING PROVIDED PURSUANT TO PROPOSITION 123
SHOULD BE ALLOCATED TO BUILDING HOUSING THAT WOULD NOT OTHERWISE
BE BUILT WITHOUT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE; AND
(IV) STATUTORY RESTRICTIONS ON ELIGIBILITY FOR ASSISTANCE
USING PROPOSITION 123 FUNDING, INCLUDING LIMITATIONS ON HOUSEHOLD
INCOME AND MAXIMUM ALLOWABLE MONTHLY HOUSING COSTS, COUPLED
WITH INCREASED INTEREST RATES, LAND COSTS, AND BUILDING MATERIAL
COSTS, ARE PREVENTING THE PROPOSITION 123 HOME OWNERSHIP PROGRAM
FROM BEING USED IN SOME COMMUNITIES.
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-040

(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS AND DECLARES THAT
IT IS THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY'S INTENT THAT THE WAIVER PROCESS SET
FORTH IN THIS SECTION WILL ALLOW THE DIVISION MORE FLEXIBILITY TO
ALLOCATE FUNDING FOR AFFORDABLE HOME OWNERSHIP PROJECTS IN
COMMUNITIES ACROSS THE STATE.
(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATION" MEANS A NON-PROFIT ORGANIZATION,
LOCAL GOVERNMENT, COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT FINANCIAL INSTITUTION
OR COMMUNITY LAND TRUST THAT IS ELIGIBLE FOR FUNDING PURSUANT TO
SECTION 29-32-104 (3)(a).
(b) "PROJECT" MEANS A RESIDENTIAL HOUSING UNIT OR GROUP OF
UNITS DESCRIBED WITHIN AN ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATION'S REQUEST FOR
FUNDING PURSUANT TO SECTION 29-32-104 (3)(a)(I).
(3) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF SECTION 29-32-104
(3)(a), AN ORGANIZATION THAT WAS AWARDED MONEY FOR AN AFFORDABLE
HOME OWNERSHIP PROJECT PURSUANT TO SECTION 29-32-104 (3)(a) AND
THAT CONSTRUCTED A RESIDENTIAL UNIT AS PART OF THE PROJECT THAT HAS
NOT BEEN PURCHASED WITHIN SIX MONTHS OF THE ISSUANCE OF A
CERTIFICATE OF OCCUPANCY, MAY SUBMIT A REQUEST TO THE DIVISION FOR
A WAIVER OF THE MAXIMUM MONTHLY HOUSING COST LIMIT FOR THAT
RESIDENTIAL UNIT.
(b) THE DIVISION MAY APPROVE A WAIVER REQUEST IF AN ELIGIBLE
ORGANIZATION AWARDED MONEY FOR AN AFFORDABLE HOME OWNERSHIP
PROGRAM PURSUANT TO SECTION 29-32-104 (3)(a) ESTABLISHES THAT:
(I) A SUBSTANTIAL NEED FOR HOUSING THE PROJECT'S TARGET
POPULATION EXISTS; AND
(II) THE UNIT HAS BEEN ADEQUATELY MARKETED TO ELIGIBLE
BUYERS FOR PURCHASE FOR AT LEAST SIX MONTHS AFTER FINAL COMPLETION
OF THE UNIT, AND THE UNIT HAS NOT BEEN PURCHASED BY AN ELIGIBLE
BUYER WITHIN THAT SIX-MONTH PERIOD.
(c) THE DIVISION MAY:
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-040

(I) ISSUE A WAIVER WITH HOUSING COST LIMITS THAT ARE DIFFERENT
FROM THOSE REQUESTED BY THE ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATION IN THE WAIVER
REQUEST IF DIFFERENT HOUSING COST LIMITS WOULD BETTER SERVE NEEDS
IDENTIFIED IN THE COMMUNITY, THE PROJECT REMAINS FINANCIALLY
FEASIBLE IN THE DIVISION'S DISCRETION, AND THERE ARE ELIGIBLE BUYERS
THAT MEET THE PARAMETERS SET BY THE DIVISION PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (3)(c)(I); OR
(II) MODIFY THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF FUNDING PROVIDED PURSUANT
TO SECTION 29-32-104 (3)(a) TO ACCOUNT FOR AN INCREASE IN THE SALE
PRICE OF THE UNIT.
(4) IN LIEU OF THE PROCESS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS
SECTION, THE DIVISION MAY APPROVE AN ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATION'S
PROCESS FOR DETERMINING WHEN TO EXCEED THE MAXIMUM MONTHLY
HOUSEHOLD INCOME FOR A UNIT FUNDED PURSUANT TO SECTION 29-32-104
(3)(a). AN ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATION'S PROCESS APPROVED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (4) SHALL NOT REQUIRE A SIX-MONTH MARKETING PERIOD.
(5) (a) FOR PROJECTS FUNDED PURSUANT TO SECTION 29-32-104
(3)(a), AN ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATION MAY REQUEST THAT THE DIVISION ALLOW
IT TO RENT RESIDENTIAL UNITS CONSTRUCTED AS PART OF THE PROJECT. THE
DIVISION HAS THE AUTHORITY TO RENT OR ALLOW THE RENTAL OF A
RESIDENTIAL UNIT CONSTRUCTED AS PART OF THE PROJECT.
(b) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE DIVISION SHALL ISSUE
GUIDANCE FOR WHEN AN ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATION MAY RENT UNITS WITHIN
A PROJECT AND DEVELOP A PROCESS BY WHICH RENTED UNITS MAY RETURN
TO THE FOR-SALE MARKET.
(c) A HOMEOWNER MAY RENT A UNIT FUNDED PURSUANT TO SECTION
29-32-104 (3)(a) AS LONG AS THE UNIT REMAINS THEIR PRIMARY RESIDENCE.
SECTION 4. Effective date - applicability. This act takes effect
July 1, 2026, and applies to requests for waivers received by the division on
or after said date.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-040

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-040